Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 10.5
UNIFIED CARRIER REGISTRATION SYSTEM

Section

40-10.5-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Commission" means the public utilities commission of the state of Colorado.

"Unified carrier registration system" means the unified carrier registration system authorized by section 4305 of the federal "Unified Carrier Registration Act of 2005", 49 U.S.C. sec. 14504a, as amended.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added, p. 1093, § 1, effective August 7.

40-10.5-102. Registration required - rules of commission.

On and after the repeal of sections 40-10-120 and 40-11-115, which occurred on September 25, 2007, a motor carrier, motor private carrier, broker, freight forwarder, leasing company, or other person required to register with the United States department of transportation under the unified carrier registration system:

Shall not engage in, or contract for, any interstate transportation of persons or property on any public highway in this state without first so registering; and

Shall comply with all applicable rules of the commission.

For purposes of carrying out the provisions of this article and relevant federal statutes and rules, the commission:

Shall participate in the uniform carrier registration system;

Is vested with the legal authority to administer the unified carrier registration agreement for the state of Colorado; and

Has the power to promulgate such rules as are necessary for the proper administration and enforcement of this article. Such rules may include, without limitation, rules establishing registration fees and other fees sufficient to cover the direct and indirect costs of administration and enforcement of this article. All fees collected under this article shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit them to the public utilities commission motor carrier fund, created in section 40-2-110.5.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added, p. 1093, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2009:

IP(1) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1983, § 123, effective August 5.